inc/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
!
! ni-PFV
!
LEXICON ni-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@D.PREFIX@   ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@               ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@D.PREFIX@ nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@D.PREFIX@ nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@si    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìniì  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnas  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ní    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;


LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìniì  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnas  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;


LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;	 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;	 

LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;	 


!
! si-PFV
!
LEXICON si-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@D.PREFIX@   si-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               si-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@               si-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               si-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sis@@D.PREFIX@ sis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             sis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             sis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             sis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sii@@D.PREFIX@ sii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             sii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             sii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             sii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;


LEXICON si-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@si    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #; 

LEXICON si-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí    #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON si-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@si    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;


LEXICON sis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON sis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsís   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON sis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON sii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #;	
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;	

LEXICON sii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON sii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #; 


!
! yi-y-PFV
!
LEXICON yi-y-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@D.PREFIX@   yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@            yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@D.PREFIX@ yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@           yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;


LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
